Maine, session 132, LD1522.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA c. 201, sub-c. 15 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 15
MAINE EVICTION PREVENTION PROGRAM
§4994-D. Maine Eviction Prevention Program
The Maine Eviction Prevention Program, referred to in this section as "the program,"
is established within the Maine State Housing Authority to provide rental assistance to
individuals.
1. Eligibility; income. The Maine State Housing Authority shall establish and
administer eligibility criteria and application requirements for participation in the program
consistent with the requirements under this subchapter. A program applicant's income may
not exceed 60% of the area median income, adjusted for family size, in accordance with
federal standards generally accepted as of the effective date of this subchapter and
comparable to the standards of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development.
2. Rental assistance. A participant in the program is eligible to receive assistance to
cover any rental arrears. In addition, a participant in the program who pays over 30% of
that participant's income in rent must receive additional assistance for up to 12 months.
3. Assistance priority. Rental assistance under this subchapter must be awarded in
the following order of priority:
A. As the first priority, participants who have received a summons and complaint for
forcible entry and detainer;
B. As the 2nd priority, participants who receive an eviction notice for nonpayment of
rent; and
C. As the 3rd priority, participants who pay over 30% of their income in rent.
4. Payment requirement. A participant in the program is required to pay 30% of the
participant's income toward the participant's rental obligation.
5. Rent requirement. A participant in the program must reside in a rental unit in
which the rent is at or below 125% of the fair market rent established by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to 24 Code of Federal
Regulations, Section 888.113 for the household size in the area in which the rental unit is
located.
6. Eviction for cause. A landlord may evict a program participant only for cause
during any month rental assistance is paid by the program.
The Maine State Housing Authority shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of
this subchapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR2260(01)

Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Stable Home Fund Z405
Initiative: Provides additional ongoing funds to continue the Maine Eviction Prevention
Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000,000 $25,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,000,000 $25,000,000